Tennessee, session 114, HB1752.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 54-1-135(b), is amended by inserting
the language "the state representatives and state senators who represent the county where the
actual or imminent transportation system failure or other emergency is located," immediately
before the language "and the comptroller of the treasury".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1752
009698
- 1 -